Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6220.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Blind trust" means a qualified blind trust or qualified diversified trust as those terms are defined in 5 CFR 2634.403. (b) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (c) "Department" means the department of state. (d) "Dependent" means an individual claimed by a public officer or a public officer's spouse as a dependent for federal income tax purposes. (e) (d) "Earned income" means salaries, wages, tips, bonuses, commissions, or other compensation or earnings from employment earned during the reporting period. (f) "Fair market value" means the value of an item or service that is available to any member of the public at the time the item or service is acquired. The value must be determined on the basis of market prices for the item or service on the day the acquisition occurs. Price fluctuations of the item or service that occurred before or after the acquisition do not affect the fair market value determination. (g) (e) "Form" means the financial disclosure form provided under section 6 and published by the department in accordance with section 11. (h) (f) "Gift" means any item a public officer receives that is required to be reported by a lobbyist or lobbyist agent under 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.411 to 4.431.that term as defined in section 4 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.414. Notwithstanding section 4(1)(d) of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.414, gift includes goods, beverages, travel-related payments or reimbursements, and tickets. (i) (g) "Honorarium" means that term as defined in section 7 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.207. (j) (h) "Liabilities" means what a person owes to another person, including, but not limited to, mortgages or other debts . For purposes of this act, a debt does not include including a revolving debt, an unsecured debt that is from a financial institution or the federal government, or a debt owed by a business entity. (k) (i) "Lobbyist" means that term as defined in section 5 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.415. (l) (j) "Lobbyist agent" means that term as defined in section 5 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.415. (m) (k) "Public officer" means all of the following: (i) A state representative. (ii) A state senator. (iii) The attorney general. (iv) The governor. (v) The lieutenant governor. (vi) The secretary of state. (vii) A member of the state board of education. (viii) A regent of the University of Michigan. (ix) A member of the board of trustees of Michigan State University. (x) A member of the board of governors of Wayne State University. (n) (l) "Report" means the financial disclosure report required under section 10 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963. The report must be in the form provided under section 6. (o) (m) "Reporting period" means the preceding calendar year. (p) (n) "Spouse" means an individual who is lawfully married to a public officer as described under 26 CFR 301.7701-18. (q) (o) "Unearned income" means income that is not earned from employment, including, but not limited to, financial prize, unemployment benefits, annuities, stock dividends, deferred compensation, pension, profit sharing, or retirement income. Unearned income does not include inheritance money or a familial gift. Sec. 6. A financial disclosure report must be in the following form: Basic Identifying Information 1. Full name:_________________________________________________ 2. Mailing address:___________________________________________ 3. Telephone number:_____________________________________ 4. Email address:_____________________________________________ 5. Are you filing as a public officer or a candidate?__________ (If you were both a public officer and a candidate during the reporting period, file as a public officer.) Spousal Information 6. Were you married during the reporting period? (yes/no) ________________ 7. Spouse's name:_____________________________________________ 8. Was your spouse a registered lobbyist in the State of Michigan during the reporting period? _________________________ 9. For any employer that paid your spouse more than $1,000 in annual income during the reporting period, list the name of the employer(s) and the occupation(s) held: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Employment & Income 10. List the name and address of each employer that paid you more than $1,000 and the positions held in the reporting period: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 11. Did you receive unearned income over $200 in the reporting period (e.g., financial prize, unemployment benefits, annuities, stock dividends, deferred compensation, pension, profit sharing, retirement income)? If yes, list the sources of unearned income, including the origins and addresses of the sources of unearned income: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Organizational Roles 12. List all positions you held in any organization, corporation, firm, partnership, or other business enterprise, nonprofit organization, labor organization, or educational or other institution other than this state during the reporting period (e.g., officer, director, trustee, partner, proprietor, representative, employee, or consultant). If applicable, for each, please provide the name of the organization and the position held: (You do not need to include positions in any: religious, social, fraternal, or political entity, or any position solely honorary in nature.) ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Assets 13. List any real property in which you or your spouse held an ownership interest during the reporting period: (Include only real property valued over $1,000; you may choose to exclude the street number, if applicable.) ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 14. List any securities or investments (stocks, bonds, mutual funds, etc.) you held, your spouse held, or you held jointly with your spouse with a fair market value over $1,000 during the reporting period, including the origins and addresses of the securities or investments: (You are not required to disclose a stock within a widely held investment fund if neither you nor your spouse exercise control over the financial interests held by the fund and the fund is publicly traded or the assets of the fund are widely diversified.) ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 15. List any other assets, other than business assets, held for the production of income, or for investment purposes, exceeding $1,000 in value that you owned during the reporting period or that your spouse owned during the reporting period if the asset has a value of $50,000 or more: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 16. Do you hold a beneficial interest in any blind trusts? (yes/no)________________________ 17. List any cryptocurrencies you held during the reporting period: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Liabilities 18. 17. List any liabilities over $10,000 you (solely or jointly) owed at any point during the reporting period (e.g., mortgages, loans, credit lines): (You may exclude: any unsecured debt from a financial institution or the federal government, any revolving debt, or a business debt.) ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Employment Agreements 19. 18. List any agreements or arrangements made or in effect during the reporting period with respect to the following: (a) Any future employment that would commence after you leave office. (b) A leave of absence from any former or current employer taken while serving as a public officer. (c) A continuation or deferral of payments by a former or current employer other than this state to you, or your continuing participation in an employee welfare or benefit plan maintained by a former employer. (If a public officer is not reelected or is not seeking reelection to public office, MCL 15.708 requires the public officer to disclose any future employment agreement within 10 days of entering into the agreement.) ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Lobbyist Interactions 20. 19. Did you receive any gift required to be reported by a lobbyist or lobbyist agent during the reporting period? If yes, please list the lobbyist's name and the gift received. If you received a gift of a ticket or offer of free or reduced-price attendance to a charity event that has the primary purpose of raising money for a nonprofit organization that is tax-exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501, or admission to a conference or educational event that is connected to public business or the performance of the governmental duties of the public officer, you must report the fair market value of the gift: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 21. 20. Did you receive any payments for travel required to be reported by a lobbyist or lobbyist agent during the reporting period? If yes, please list the lobbyist's name and the travel payment received: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 22. 21. Did you receive any payments to a charity in lieu of honoraria required to be reported by a lobbyist or lobbyist agent during the reporting period? If yes, please list the lobbyist's name and the payment to charity received: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Gifts and Travel 23. Did you receive any gifts with a value of $1,000 or more from an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity? If yes, please list the person's name and the gift received: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 24. Did you receive any payments for travel from or have travel paid on your behalf by an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity? If yes, please list the person's name and the travel payment received: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ State Contracts 25. 22. Do you or your spouse hold a majority financial interest of 10% or more in any current or prospective contracts with the State of Michigan? If yes, provide the name of the company and a description of all contracts: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Dependent Disclosures 26. How many dependents do you or your spouse have? _________ 27. If an employer pays a dependent more than $50,000, list the name of the employer and the principal activity of that employer: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 28. List any securities or investments (stocks, bonds, mutual funds, etc.) a dependent held with a fair market value over $50,000 during the reporting period, including the origins and addresses of the securities or investments: (You are not required to disclose a stock within a widely held investment fund if the fund is publicly traded or the assets of the fund are widely diversified.) ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 29. List any other assets, other than business assets, held by a dependent for the production of income, or for investment purposes, exceeding $50,000 in value during the reporting period: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ 30. List any interest that a dependent had during the reporting period in a legal entity that conducts business in this state, including the name of the legal entity, if the interest has a fair market value of $50,000 or more: ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Additional disclosuresDisclosures ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________ Certification "I certify that the statements I have made on this financial disclosure form are true, complete, and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief, and that I have not moved assets during the reporting period for purpose of avoiding disclosure under the public officers financial disclosure act." Signed: ______________________________________________________ Sec. 7. (1) A report required under section 5 must include a complete statement of all of the following: (a) The full name, mailing address, telephone number, and email address of the public officer. (b) The name and address of the public officer's employer or employers and the positions held during the reporting period, if the public officer receives $1,000.00 or more in annual income from each position. (c) The name of the spouse of the public officer and, if the public officer's spouse receives $1,000.00 or more in annual income, the occupation of the public officer's spouse and the name of the employer or employers of the public officer's spouse. (d) Whether the public officer's spouse was registered as a lobbyist or lobbyist agent under 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.411 to 4.431, during the reporting period. (e) A list of all positions currently held as an officer, director, trustee, partner, proprietor, representative, employee, or consultant of any organization, corporation, firm, partnership, or other business enterprise, nonprofit organization, labor organization, or educational or other institution other than this state. If this subdivision applies, the public officer shall include the name of the organization. For purposes of this subdivision, positions held in any religious, social, fraternal, or political entity, or positions that are solely of an honorary nature, are excluded. (f) The source of earned income received during the reporting period by the public officer. For purposes of this subdivision, the public officer must disclose each source of income received during the reporting period that is $1,000.00 or more. (g) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a list of each asset, excluding a business asset, held by the public officer for investment or production of income with a fair market value of $1,000.00 or more during the reporting period, each asset, excluding a business asset, held by the public officer's spouse for investment or production of income with a fair market value of $50,000.00 or more during the reporting period, and any sources of unearned income that exceed $200.00 during the reporting period, including the origins and addresses of the sources of unearned income. The fair market value for the purpose of listing each asset, excluding a business asset, held for investment or production of income under this subdivision must be adjusted for inflation every 4 years using the Consumer Price Index, and rounded up to the nearest $1,000.00. (h) A list of all liabilities that exceed $10,000.00 owed by the public officer to a creditor at any time during the reporting period. (i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a list of any stocks, bonds, or other forms of securities held by the public officer, the public officer's spouse, or held jointly with the public officer's spouse during the reporting period, including the origin and address of the security, if the security has a total aggregate fair market value of $1,000.00 or more. The fair market value for the purpose of listing stocks, bonds, or other forms of securities under this subdivision must be adjusted for inflation every 4 years using the Consumer Price Index, and rounded up to the nearest $1,000.00. For purposes of this act, a public officer is not required to disclose a stock within a widely held investment fund, including, but not limited to, a mutual fund, regulated investment company, pension or deferred compensation plan, or other investment fund, if both of the following apply: (i) Either the fund is publicly traded or the assets of the fund are widely diversified. (ii) The public officer or the public officer's spouse does not exercise control over or have the ability to exercise control over the financial interests held by the fund. (j) A list of any real property in which the public officer or public officer's spouse holds an ownership or other financial interest. For purposes of this subdivision, the public officer is required to include a real property in the report only if that real property has a fair market value of $1,000.00 or more during the reporting period. A public officer filing a report may exclude the street number of a parcel of real property under this subdivision. (k) A list of any cryptocurrencies held by the public officer during the reporting period. (l) (k) The date of, identity of parties to, and general terms of any agreements or arrangements made or in effect during the reporting period with respect to the following: (i) Any future employment that would commence after the public officer leaves office. (ii) A leave of absence from any former or current employer taken while serving as a public officer. (iii) A continuation or deferral of payments by a former or current employer other than this state to the public officer, or the public officer's continuing participation in an employee welfare or benefit plan maintained by a former employer. (m) (l) A list of all gifts received and required to be reported during the reporting period by a lobbyist or lobbyist agent under state law, including the name of the lobbyist or lobbyist agent that provided the gift. If the public officer receives either of the following gifts from a lobbyist, the public officer must report the fair market value of the gift: (i) A ticket or offer of free or reduced-price attendance to a charity event that has the primary purpose of raising money for a nonprofit organization that is tax-exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501. (ii) Admission to a conference or educational event that is connected to public business or the performance of the governmental duties of the public officer. (n) A list of all gifts with a value of $1,000.00 or more received from an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity. (o) Â (m) A list of all travel payments received and required to be reported during the reporting period by a lobbyist or lobbyist agent under state law, including the name of the lobbyist or lobbyist agent that provided the travel payment. (p) A list of all travel payments with a value of $1,000.00 or more received by or made on behalf of the public officer from an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity. (q) Â (n) A list of each payment made by a lobbyist or lobbyist agent during the reporting period to a charity in lieu of honoraria, including the name of the lobbyist or lobbyist agent that made the payment. (r) Â (o) If applicable, a statement indicating that the public officer or the public officer's spouse is a registered vendor with this state, has a majority an interest of 10% or more in a company that is a registered vendor with this state, or is employed by a company that is a registered vendor with this state. If the public officer or the public officer's spouse is a registered vendor with this state or has a majority an interest of 10% or more in a company that is a registered vendor with this state, the public officer shall include the name of the company and a description of all contracts entered into with this state by the public officer, public officer's spouse, or company in which the public officer or public officer's spouse has a majority an interest of 10% or more during the reporting period. If the public officer or public officer's spouse is employed by a company that is a registered vendor with this state, the public officer shall include the name of the company and a description of all contracts entered into with this state that the public officer or the public officer's spouse worked on directly during the reporting period. (s) All of the following information related to each of the public officer's dependents, referred to by the dependent's first and last initial, as applicable: (i) The number of dependents that the public officer or public officer's spouse has. (ii) If a dependent earns $50,000.00 or more from an employer during the reporting period, the principal activity of that employer. (iii) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, a list of each asset, excluding a business asset, held by a dependent for investment or production of income with a fair market value of $50,000.00 or more during the reporting period. The fair market value for the purpose of listing each asset, excluding a business asset, held for investment or production of income under this subdivision must be adjusted for inflation every 4 years using the Consumer Price Index and rounded up to the nearest $1,000.00. (iv) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, a list of any stocks, bonds, or other forms of securities held by a dependent during the reporting period, including the origin and address of the security, if the security has a total aggregate fair market value of $50,000.00 or more. The fair market value for the purpose of listing stocks, bonds, or other forms of securities under this subdivision must be adjusted for inflation every 4 years using the Consumer Price Index. For purposes of this subparagraph, a public officer is not required to disclose a stock within a widely held investment fund, including, but not limited to, a mutual fund, regulated investment company, pension or deferred compensation plan, or other investment fund, if the fund is publicly traded or the assets of the fund are widely diversified. (v) A description of any interest that a dependent had during the reporting period in a legal entity that conducts business in this state, including the name of the legal entity, if the interest has a fair market value of $50,000.00 or more. (2) A public officer is not required to disclose the value of any disclosure under subsection (1). (3) If a public officer required to file a report under this section holds a beneficial interest in a blind trust, the public officer is not required to include the interests or assets of the blind trust in the report. However, the public officer must indicate in the public officer's report that the public officer holds a beneficial interest in a blind trust. For purposes of this subsection, "beneficial interest" includes, but is not limited to, the interest in a trust of a qualified trust beneficiary or trust beneficiary as those terms are defined under section 7103 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.7103. (4) A report required under section 5 must include the following certification: "I certify that the statements I have made on this financial disclosure form are true, complete, and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief, and that I have not moved assets during the reporting period for the purpose of avoiding disclosure under the public officers financial disclosure act".